Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.286

Discrimination, harassment, intimidation, and bullying—Policies and complaint procedures—Posting of model student handbook language.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1296-S.SL) ***

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop, and periodically update, model student handbook language that includes information about policies and complaint procedures related to discrimination, including sexual harassment and addressing transgender students, and information about policies and complaint procedures related to harassment, intimidation, and bullying, as well as the overlap between the policies and complaint procedures. The model student handbook language must also include a description of the services available through the office of the education ombuds and the contact information for the office of the education ombuds. The model student handbook language must be aligned with existing requirements in state law including chapters 28A.640 and 28A.642 RCW and RCW 28A.600.477 and 28A.600.510. The model student handbook language must be jointly developed with the Washington state school directors' association, and in consultation with the office of the education ombuds. The model student handbook language must be posted publicly on the office of the superintendent of public instruction's website beginning July 1, 2024.

(2) Beginning with the 2024-25 school year, each school district must include the model student handbook language developed under subsection (1) of this section in any student, parent, employee, and volunteer handbook that it or one of its schools publishes and on the school district's website, and any school's website, if a school or the school district maintains a website. If a school district neither publishes a handbook nor maintains a website, it must provide the model student handbook language developed under subsection (1) of this section to each student, parent, employee, and volunteer at least annually.

[ 2023 c 242 s 1.]